Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.415

Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation registered to conduct affairs in this state may withdraw from this state by delivering a statement of withdrawal to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with RCW 23.95.530.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4128; 1993 c 356 s 20; 1982 c 35 s 148; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 83.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.